West Virginia, session 2026, SB798.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Medicine. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-3-7 of this code, relating to the Board of Medicine (continuing education for physicians and podiatric physicians, 11 CSR 06), is authorized.